Utah statutes.
31A-9-212.   Separate accounts and subsidiaries.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), Sections 31A-5-217 and
31A-5-218 apply to separate accounts and subsidiaries of fraternals. If a
fraternal issues contracts on a variable basis, Subsections 31A-22-902(2) and
(6) and 31A-9-209(2) do not apply, except that Subsection 31A-9-209(2) applies
to any benefits contained in the variable contracts which are fixed or
guaranteed dollar amounts.
(2)  If a fraternal engages in any insurance business other than life,
accident and health, annuities, property, or liability insurance, it shall do
so through a subsidiary under Section 31A-5-218.
(3) (a)  A local lodge may incorporate under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah
Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, or the corresponding law of the state where
it is located, to carry out the noninsurance activities of the local lodge.
(b)  Corporations may be formed under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised
Nonprofit Corporation Act, to implement Subsection 31A-9-602(2).
